public/dictionaries/en/index.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'

PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 re .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I 0 in .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 un .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C 0 de .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 dis .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F 0 con .

PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 pro .

SFX V N 2
SFX V e ing e
SFX V 0 ing [^e]

SFX N Y 3
SFX N e en e
SFX N y ien y
SFX N 0 en [^ey]

SFX X Y 3
SFX X e er e
SFX X y ier y
SFX X 0 er [^ey]

SFX H N 2
SFX H y ieth y
SFX H 0 th [^y]

SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y 0 ly .

SFX G Y 2
SFX G e ing e
SFX G 0 ing [^e]

SFX J Y 2
SFX J e ings e
SFX J 0 ings [^e]

SFX D Y 4
SFX D 0 d [^(ey)]
SFX D y ied y
SFX D e d e
SFX D 0 ed [^(ey)]

SFX T N 4
SFX T 0 st [^(ey)]
SFX T y iest y
SFX T e st e
SFX T 0 est [^(ey)]

SFX R Y 4
SFX R 0 r [^(ey)]
SFX R y ier y
SFX R e r e
SFX R 0 er [^(ey)]

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z 0 s [^(shxyzaeiou)]
SFX Z y ies y
SFX Z [shxz] es shxz
SFX Z [^(shxzy)] s [^(shxzy)]

SFX S Y 4
SFX S 0 s [^(shxyzaeiou)]
SFX S y ies y
SFX S [shxz] es shxz
SFX S [^(shxzy)] s [^(shxzy)]

SFX P Y 3
SFX P y iness y
SFX P 0 ness [^y]
SFX P 0 ness [^y]

SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 's .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B y ily y
SFX B 0 ly [^y]
SFX B 0 ly [^y]

SFX L Y 1
SFX L 0 ment .

REP 90
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP u oo
REP oo u
REP u ew
REP ew u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP ough uff
REP uff ow
REP ow uff
REP u you
REP you u
REP xc ec
REP ec xc
REP x ec
REP ec x
REP x egg
REP egg x
REP y ie
REP ie y
REP y igh
REP igh y
REP y uy
REP uy y
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP z s
REP s z
